Washington statutes.
RCW 9.96.050

Final discharge of parolee—Restoration of civil rights—Governor's pardoning power not affected.

(1)(a) When an offender on parole has performed all obligations of his or her release, including any and all legal financial obligations, for such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board that his or her final release is not incompatible with the best interests of society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the board may make a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of discharge to the offender.

(b) The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of discharge after the expiration of the offender's or parolee's maximum statutory sentence. If not earlier granted and any and all legal financial obligations have been paid, the board shall issue a final order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the three years.

(c) The discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520, and the certification of discharge shall so state.

(d) This restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to receive, possess, own, or transport firearms.

(e) The board shall issue a certificate of discharge to the offender in person or by mail to the offender's last known address.

(2) A copy of every signed certificate of discharge for offender sentences under the authority of the department of corrections shall be placed in the department's files.

(3) The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered as a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon any such person.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 22; 2009 c 325 s 4. Prior: 2007 c 363 s 4; 2007 c 171 s 2; 2002 c 16 s 3; 1993 c 140 s 4; 1980 c 75 s 1; 1961 c 187 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Intent—2002 c 16: See note following RCW 9.94A.637.